Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the tobacco settlement authority created in this chapter.

(2) "Board" means the governing board of the authority.

(3) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, and other obligations and financing arrangements issued or entered into by the authority under this chapter.

(4) "Master settlement agreement" means the national master settlement agreement and related documents entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and the four principal United States tobacco product manufacturers, as amended and supplemented, for the settlement of litigation brought by the state against the tobacco product manufacturers.

(5) "Sales agreement" means any agreement authorized under this chapter in which the state provides for the sale to the authority of a portion of the payments required to be made by tobacco product manufacturers to the state and the state's rights to receive such payments, pursuant to the master settlement agreement.

[ 2002 c 365 s 2.]